Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-406
County service committee; members; appointment.

To assist the Department of Veterans' Affairs in the performance of its duties, each county board shall appoint, in each county of the state, a county service committee as provided in section 80-101.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 14, p. 933.